Virginia statutes. Title 40.1. Labor and Employment.
Article 5. Safety Provisions.
§ 40.1-51.2.
Rights and duties of employees.

It shall be the duty of each employee to comply with all occupational safety and health rules and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter and any orders issued thereunder which are applicable to his own action and conduct.

Employees or their representatives may bring to the attention of their employer any hazardous conditions that exist or bring the matter to the attention of the Commissioner or his authorized representative, without first bringing the matter to the attention of their employer. Upon receipt of any complaint of hazardous conditions, the Commissioner or his authorized representative shall cause an inspection to be made as soon as practicable. Within two working days after making the oral complaint the employee or the employee representative shall file a written complaint with the Commissioner on a form prescribed by the Commissioner, if at that time, the Commissioner or his authorized representative has not caused the hazardous condition to be corrected. A copy of such written complaint shall be made available to the employer by the Commissioner at the time of such inspection. The name or names of individuals bringing such matters to the attention of the Commissioner shall be held in confidence upon request of such individuals.

[Repealed.]

A representative of the employees selected by the employees shall be given an opportunity to accompany the Commissioner or his authorized representative during the physical inspection of the work place for the purpose of aiding such inspection. Where there is no authorized employee representative, the Commissioner or his authorized representative shall consult with a reasonable number of employees concerning matters of health and safety at the work place. No person shall discharge or in any manner discriminate against an employee representative for his participation in any safety and health inspection.

The employer and the complaining employee, employees or employee representative shall be notified in writing by the Commissioner or his authorized representative of any decision concerning a complaint, of the reasons for such decision and of the rights of the parties to redress pursuant to §

40.1-49.4

of the Code.

History.

1972, c. 602; 1973, c. 425; 1976, c. 607.

Law Review.

For note on employee drug testing, see 74 Va. L. Rev. 969 (1988).

For 1991 survey on employment law, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 759 (1991).

§ 40.1-51.2:1.
Discrimination against employee for exercising rights prohibited.

No person shall discharge or in any way discriminate against an employee because the employee has filed a safety or health complaint or has testified or otherwise acted to exercise rights under the safety and health provisions of this title for themselves or others.

History.

1979, c. 354.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

For note, “Erosion of the Employment-at-Will Doctrine: Recognition of an Employee’s Right to Job Security,” see 43 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 593 (1986).

For article, “The Law of Wrongful Discharge in Virginia,” see 10 G.M.U. L. Rev. 133 (1988).

§ 40.1-51.2:2.
Remedy for discrimination.

Any employee who believes that he or she has been discharged or otherwise discriminated against by any person in violation of §

40.1-51.2:1

may, within 60 days after such violation occurs, file a complaint with the Commissioner alleging such discharge or discrimination. The employee shall be prohibited from seeking relief under this section if he fails to file such complaint within the 60-day time period. Upon receipt of such complaint, the Commissioner shall cause such investigation to be made as he deems appropriate. If, upon such investigation, he determines that the provisions of §

40.1-51.2:1

have been violated, he shall attempt by conciliation to have the violation abated without economic loss to the employee. In the event a voluntary agreement cannot be obtained, the Commissioner shall bring an action in a circuit court having jurisdiction over the person charged with the violation. The court shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain violations and order appropriate relief, including rehiring or reinstatement of the employee to his former position with back pay plus interest at a rate not to exceed eight percent per annum.

Should the Commissioner, based on the results of his investigation of the complaint, refuse to issue a charge against the person that allegedly discriminated against the employee, the employee may bring action in a circuit court having jurisdiction over the person allegedly discriminating against the employee, for appropriate relief.

History.

1979, c. 354; 2001, c. 332; 2005, cc. 743, 789.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 332 substituted “sixty” for “thirty” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by cc. 743 and 789 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “60” for “sixty” and inserted the second sentence.

Law Review.

For article, “Enforcement of Occupational Safety and Health Laws in Virginia: A New Beginning,” see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 535 (1978).

§ 40.1-51.3.
Duties of health and safety inspectors.

It shall be the duty of all safety and health inspectors to inspect all places of business covered by the State Plan developed in accordance with the Federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (P.L. 91-596) for conformity with the provisions of this title and with all safety and health standards, rules and regulations promulgated under this title.

[Repealed.]

History.

1972, c. 602; 1979, c. 354.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

For note on employee drug testing, see 74 Va. L. Rev. 969 (1988).

§ 40.1-51.3:1.
Penalty for giving advance notice of safety or health inspection under this title.

Any person who gives advance notice of any safety or health inspection to be conducted under the provisions of this title without authority of the Commissioner or his authorized representative shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

1973, c. 425; 1994, c. 28.

Law Review.

For article, “Enforcement of Occupational Safety and Health Laws in Virginia: A New Beginning,” see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 535 (1978).

§ 40.1-51.3:2.
Evidence of civil penalty against employer under state, federal, etc., safety codes inadmissible in personal injury or property damage trial.

In the trial of any action to recover for personal injury or property damage sustained by any party, in which action it is alleged that an employer acted in violation of or failed to act in accordance with any provision of this chapter or any state or federal occupational safety, health and safety standards act, the fact of the issuance of a citation, the voluntary payment of a civil penalty by a party charged with a violation, or the judicial assessment of a civil penalty under this chapter or any such state or federal occupational safety, health and safety standards act, shall not be admissible in evidence.

History.

1974, c. 516.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on evidence for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1543 (1974).

For survey of Virginia law on torts for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1615 (1974).

§ 40.1-51.4.
Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 354.

§ 40.1-51.4:1.
Confidentiality of trade secrets.

All information reported to or otherwise obtained by the Commissioner or his authorized representative in connection with any inspection or proceeding under this title which contains or which might reveal a trade secret referred to in § 1905 of Title 18 of the United States Code shall be considered confidential for the purpose of that section, except that such information may be disclosed to the Commissioner or his authorized representatives concerned with carrying out any provisions of this title or any proceeding under the aforementioned title. In any such proceeding, the court, the Safety and Health Codes Board or the Commissioner shall issue such orders as may be appropriate to protect the confidentiality of trade secrets.

History.

1976, c. 607; 1994, c. 28.

§ 40.1-51.4:2.
Penalty for making false statements, etc.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under this title shall upon conviction be punished by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by imprisonment for not more than six months or by both.

History.

1976, c. 607; 1994, c. 28.

Law Review.

For article, “Enforcement of Occupational Safety and Health Laws in Virginia: A New Beginning,” see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 535 (1978).

§ 40.1-51.4:3.
Prohibition of use of certain questions on polygraph tests for employment.

No employer shall, as a condition of employment, require a prospective employee to answer questions in a polygraph test concerning the prospective employee’s sexual activities unless such sexual activity of the prospective employee has resulted in a conviction of a violation of the criminal laws of this Commonwealth. Any written record of the results of a polygraph examination given to a prospective employee by an employer shall be destroyed or maintained on a confidential basis by the employer giving the examination and shall be open to inspection only upon agreement of the employee tested.

Violation of this section shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1977, c. 521; 1990, c. 368.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Law Review.

For article, “The Polygraph in the Workplace,” see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 43 (1983).

For article, “Common Law Remedies of Employees Injured by Employer Use of Polygraph Testing,” see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 51 (1987).

§ 40.1-51.4:4.
Prohibition of use of polygraphs in certain employment situations.

As used in this section, the term “lie detector test” means any test utilizing a polygraph or any other device, mechanism or instrument which is operated, or the results of which are used or interpreted by an examiner for the purpose of purporting to assist in or enable the detection of deception, the verification of truthfulness, or the rendering of a diagnostic opinion regarding the honesty of an individual.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

40.1-2.1

, it shall be unlawful for any law-enforcement agency as defined in §

9.1-500

or regional jail to require any employee to submit to a lie detector test, or to discharge, demote or otherwise discriminate against any employee for refusal or failure to take a lie detector test, except that the chief executive officer of a law-enforcement agency or the superintendent of a regional jail may, by written directive, require an employee to submit to a lie detector test related to a particular internal administrative investigation concerning allegations of misconduct or criminal activity. No employee required to submit to a lie detector test shall be discharged, demoted or otherwise discriminated against solely on the basis of the results of the lie detector test.

Any person who believes that he has been discharged, demoted or otherwise discriminated against by any person in violation of this section may, within 90 days after such alleged violation occurs, file a complaint with the Commissioner. Upon a finding by the Commissioner of a violation of this section, the Commissioner shall order, in the event of discharge or demotion, reinstatement of such person to his former position with back pay plus interest at a rate not to exceed eight percent per annum. Such orders of the Commissioner which have become final under the Virginia Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) may be recorded, enforced and satisfied as orders or decrees of a circuit court upon certification of such orders by the Commissioner. The Commissioner, or his authorized representative, shall have the right to petition circuit court for injunctive or such other relief as may be necessary for enforcement of this section. No fees or costs shall be charged the Commonwealth by a court or any officer for or in connection with the filing of the complaint, pleadings, or other papers in any action authorized by this section.

The analysis of any polygraph test charts produced during any polygraph examination administered to a party or witness shall not be submitted, referenced, referred to, offered or presented in any manner in any proceeding conducted pursuant to §

2.2-1202.1

or conducted by any county, city or town except as to disciplinary or other actions taken against a polygrapher.

History.

1994, c. 561; 1998, c. 140; 2000, cc. 585, 591; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

The 1998 amendment,

in the first sentence of subsection B, inserted “or regional jail” and inserted “or the superintendent of a regional jail.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 585 and 591 are identical, and inserted “as defined in § 2.1-116.1” in the first sentence of subsection B; and added subsection D.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835,
cl. 8, are identical, and substituted “§

2.2-1202.1

” for “Chapter 10 (§

2.2-1000

et seq.) of Title 2.2” in subsection D.

§ 40.1-51.4:5.
Immunity of employees for reporting threatening conduct.

Any employee who, in good faith with reasonable cause and without malice, truthfully reports threatening conduct by a person employed at the same workplace shall be immune from all civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as the result of making such a report.

As used in subsection A, “threatening conduct” means any conduct that would place a person in reasonable apprehension of death or bodily injury.

The immunity provided by this section shall not abrogate any other immunity that an employee may be entitled to assert.

History.

2002, c. 537.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in labor and employment law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2002).